Washington statutes.
RCW 36.26.040

Public defender—Qualifications—Term.

Every public defender and every assistant public defender must be a qualified attorney licensed to practice law in this state; and the term of the public defender shall coincide with the elected term of the prosecuting attorney.

[ 1969 c 94 s 4.]